New York, session 2025-2026, S5922.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 27-f to 2 read as follows: 3 § 27-f. Requiring first aid materials in a workplace to include an 4 opioid antagonist. All employers that are federally mandated to have 5 first aid supplies readily available for the treatment of all injured 6 employees must include an opioid antagonist in such first aid supplies. 7 For the purposes of this section, "employer" includes any person, corpo- 8 ration, limited liability company, or association employing any indi- 9 vidual in any occupation, industry, trade, business, or service. The 10 term "employer" shall not include a governmental agency. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 12 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05773-03-5